Utah statutes.
31A-22-417.   Physical examination and autopsy.

A life insurer may, at its own expense, examine the body of the insured when and as often as the insurer reasonably requires during the pendency of a claim, and it may make an autopsy in case of death where it is reasonably necessary and not forbidden by law.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

